Utah statutes.
31A-5-703.   Nonrenewals, cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance
agreements.
(1) (a)  A nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision of ceded reinsurance
agreements is not subject to the reporting requirements of Section 31A-5-701
if:
(i)  the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision is not material; or
(ii)  with respect to a property and casualty business, the insurer's total
ceded written premium, on an annualized basis, is less than 10% of its total
written premium for direct and assumed business; or
(iii)  with respect to a life, annuity, and accident and health business, the
total reserve credit taken for business ceded, on an annualized basis, is less
than 10% of the statutory reserve requirement prior to a cession.
(b)  For purposes of this part, a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or
revision is one that affects:
(i)  with respect to a property and casualty business:
(A)  more than 50% of the insurer's total ceded written premium; or
(B)  more than 50% of the insurer's total ceded indemnity and loss adjustment
reserves;
(ii)  with respect to a life, annuity, and accident and health business, more
than 50% of the total reserve credit taken for business ceded, on an
annualized basis, as indicated in the insurer's most recent annual statement;
or
(iii)  with respect to either property and casualty or life, annuity, or
accident and health business:
(A)  an authorized reinsurer representing more than 10% of a total cession is
replaced by one or more unauthorized reinsurers; or
(B)  previously established collateral requirements have been reduced or
waived as respects one or more unauthorized reinsurers representing
collectively more than 10% of a total cession.
(2) (a)  The following information is required to be disclosed in any report
filed pursuant to Section 31A-5-701 of a material nonrenewal, cancellation, or
revision of a ceded reinsurance agreement:
(i)  the effective date of the nonrenewal, cancellation, or revision;
(ii)  the description of the transaction with an identification of the
initiator of the transaction;
(iii)  the purpose of, or reason for the transaction; and
(iv)  if applicable, the identity of the replacement reinsurers.
(b) (i)  Insurers are required to report all material nonrenewals,
cancellations, or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements on a
nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer:
(A)  is part of a consolidated group of insurers that uses a pooling
arrangement or 100% reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and
integrity of the insurer's reserves; and
(B)  ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool.
(ii)  An insurer is considered to have ceded substantially all of its direct
and assumed business to a pool if:
(A)  the insurer has less than $1,000,000 total direct plus assumed written
premiums during a calendar year that are not subject to a pooling arrangement;
and
(B)  the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement
represents less than 5% of the insurer's capital and surplus.
